Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.195

Child care centers—Negotiated rule making.

When the secretary elects to engage in negotiated rule making pursuant to RCW 34.05.310(2)(a), the department must include the largest organization representing child care center owners and directors; the largest organization representing supervisors, teachers, and aides; and other affected interests before adopting requirements that affect child care center licensees.

[ 2021 c 199 s 312.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.